Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1758
Violation; action for recovery of damages; award; statute of limitations.

(1) Any purchaser injured by a violation of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act or by the seller's breach of a contract subject to the act or of any obligation arising from the sale or lease of the seller-assisted marketing plan may bring an action for recovery of damages. Judgment shall be entered for actual damages suffered by the purchaser, plus reasonable attorney's fees and costs. When the purchaser is able to return all the equipment, supplies, or products delivered by the seller, the actual damages awarded shall not be less than the amount of the initial payment. When such complete return cannot be made, the actual damages awarded shall not be less than the amount of the initial payment less the fair market value at the time of delivery of the equipment, supplies, or products that cannot be returned but were actually delivered by the seller.

(2) Any action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within five years of the date of the sale of the seller-assisted marketing plan.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 58;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 25.